Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-242
Telephone solicitation, defined.

(1) Telephone solicitation means a telephone call or message using an automatic dialing-announcing device for the purpose of encouraging the purchase or rental of, or investment in, property, goods, or services, which call or message is transmitted to any person.

(2) Telephone solicitation does not include a call or message (a) made to any person with the person's prior express invitation or permission, (b) made to any person with whom the caller has an established business relationship, (c) made by a tax-exempt nonprofit organization, (d) not made for commercial purposes, (e) made for a commercial purpose but which does not include the transmission of an unsolicited advertisement, or (f) placed by a live operator and a prerecorded message is not utilized.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1206;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 104;

Laws 2008, LB720, § 2.